Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.440

Voter name change.

A registered voter who changes his or her name shall notify the county auditor regarding the name change by submitting a notice clearly identifying the name under which he or she is registered to vote, the voter's new name, and the voter's residence, and providing a signature of the new name, or by submitting a voter registration application.

[ 2011 c 10 s 16; 2009 c 369 s 25; 2003 c 111 s 231; 1994 c 57 s 37; 1991 c 81 s 25. Formerly RCW 29.10.051.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Severability—Effective date—1994 c 57: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.

Effective date—1991 c 81: See note following RCW 29A.84.540.